Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-19] Subordination of mortgage to
agreement with government. The authority may agree in any mortgage made by
it that the mortgage shall be subordinate to a contract for the supervision by
a government agency of the operation and maintenance of the mortgaged property
and the construction of improvements thereon. In that event, any purchaser or
purchasers at a sale of the property of the authority pursuant to a foreclosure
of the mortgage or any other remedy in connection therewith shall obtain title
subject to the contract. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next